New Jersey, session 221, A1143.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the terms of a contract entered into between the Divisions of Mental Health and Addiction Services and Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services and a program providing mental health services, substance use treatment services, or services to persons with developmental disabilities on or after the effective date of this act shall include an annual increase in the cost of living adjustment received by the organization.  The cost of living adjustment shall be based on the Consumer Price Index for the previous 12-month period beginning October 1 and ending September 30, as published by the United States Department of Labor. b.    On October 1 of each year, the department shall announce the rate of the increase in the cost of living adjustment received by a program providing mental health services, substance use treatment services, or services to persons with developmental disabilities pursuant to subsection a. of this section. c.     As used in this section, a program providing mental health services, substance use treatment services, or services to persons with developmental disabilities shall include State programs partially funded or fully funded by Medicaid and licensed or approved by the Commissioner of Human Services or other appropriate State licensing entities. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.